src/morphology/stems/smj-propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

 

! ======================== !
! Proper name lexicon part !
! ======================== !

! Table of contents
! -----
! *FirstComponentProper
! *ProperNoun-smj-nocomp
! *ProperNoun-smj
! **ProperNoun-sma
! **ProperNoun-sme
! **Unassimilated
! **Err/Orth tags with norm in SMI-file** 


LEXICON FirstComponentProper !!= * __@CODE@__ Proper shortcomponents
   Áksjovuodna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Áksjovuon%>  RHyph ;
      Ájluokta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Ájluovt%>    RHyph ;
     Utsvuodna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Uhtsvuon%>   RHyph ;
   Vuodnabahta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Vuodnabat%>  RHyph ;
   Rudnávuodna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Rudnávuon%>  RHyph ;
   Bákteluokta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Bákteluovt%> RHyph ;
     Gásluokta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Gásluovt%>   RHyph ;
 Biehtselåpptå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Biehtslåpt%> RHyph ;
       Ájládde+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Ájlát%>      RHyph ;

LEXICON ProperNoun-smj-nocomp
Ánu ACCRA-mal ;
Snev BERN-sur ;

LEXICON flagpropK
@U.Cap.Obl@ K ;

LEXICON ProperNoun-smj !!= * __@CODE@__ Lule Saami proper nouns
Várjjat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:Várjjat flagpropK ; 
Muitte% mu+MWE+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom+OLang/SME:Muitte% mu flagpropK ;
Muitte% mu+MWE+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc+OLang/SME:Muitte% mu flagpropK ;
Muitte% mu+MWE+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+OLang/SME:Muitte% mu flagpropK ;
